Utah statutes.
78A-6-121.   Entry of judgement for fine or restitution -- Transfer for
collection.
(1)  If, prior to the entry of any order terminating jurisdiction of a
juvenile, there remains any unpaid balance for any fine or restitution ordered
by the court, the court shall record all pertinent information in the
juvenile's file and transfer responsibility to collect all unpaid fines and
restitution to the Office of State Debt Collection.
(2)  Before transferring the responsibility to collect any past due fines, the
court shall reduce the order to a judgment listing the Office of State Debt
Collection as the judgment creditor.
(3)  Before transferring the responsibility to collect any past due accounts
receivable for restitution to a victim, the court shall reduce the restitution
order to a judgment listing the victim, or the estate of the victim, as the
judgment creditor.
